Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1098
School of cosmetology license; school of esthetics license; application.

Any person seeking a license to operate a school of cosmetology or school of esthetics shall submit a completed application at least thirty days before construction or remodeling of the building proposed for use is scheduled to begin. If no construction or remodeling is planned, the application shall be received at least thirty days before the proposed opening of the school.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 98;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 38;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 169;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 35;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 31;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,137;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 360.